New Jersey, session 222, S4286.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Board means the New Jersey Board of Public Utilities or a successor agency. Electric public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that transmits and distributes electricity to end users within the State. Gas public utility mans a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that distributes gas to end users in the State. Nonprofit organization means a nonprofit organization that provides services throughout the State, has an annual budget of $500,000 or less, and is tax exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. s.501(c)(3)). b.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, the Board of Public Utilities shall expand the eligibility requirements of its Fresh Start Program, as established by the board, to include payment forgiveness under the program for any commercial customer that is a nonprofit organization in arrearages with an electric public utility or gas public utility that does business in the State, as applicable. c.     Notwithstanding any law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, after the effective date of this section, each electric public utility and gas public utility that does business in the State shall review its customer accounts to identify and automatically enroll any commercial customer that is a nonprofit organization in arrearages with the electric public utility or gas public utility, as applicable. d.    The board shall, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), adopt rules and regulations as necessary to implement this act. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.